Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2465.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Cpl. Melvin Philip "Dutch" Henry Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Melvin Philip "Dutch" Henry was born November 8, 1906.(2) Cpl. Henry grew up in Houtzdale Borough, Clearfield County. He attended Philipsburg-Osceola Area School District.(3) Outside of work, Cpl. Henry was a stunt man and parachutist with Jack Langley's Flying Falcons.(4) Cpl. Henry served in the United States Army Air Corps, 1st Air Cargo Squadron.(5) Throughout his military career, Cpl. Henry 123456789101112131415161718 demonstrated exceptional dedication and bravery, earning the Distinguished Flying Cross with Oak Leaf Cluster and the Air Medal with two Oak Leaf Clusters.(6) On June 18, 1945, Cpl. Henry was reported missing-in-action over Burma, India. A presumptive finding of death was issued on June 19, 1946.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 11231, on that portion of Pennsylvania Route 53 over the Beaver Run River, Houtzdale Borough, Clearfield County, is designated the Cpl. Melvin Philip "Dutch" Henry Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2465PN3300 - 2 - 123456789101112131415